New Mexico, session 2026, HB126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 50-4-36 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2020, Chapter 16, Section 1) is amended to read: "50-4-36. WORKPLACE SEXUAL HARASSMENT, DISCRIMINATION AND RETALIATION CLAIMS--NONDISCLOSURE AND NONDISPARAGEMENT AGREEMENTS [AND]--CERTAIN ACTIONS PROHIBITED.-- A. A private employer shall not: [as a term of employment] (1) require [an] a prospective, current or former employee or an independent contractor to sign a nondisclosure or nondisparagement provision of a settlement agreement relating to a claim of sexual harassment, discrimination or retaliation in the workplace brought by the employee; or (2) prevent the employee from disclosing a claim of sexual harassment, discrimination or retaliation [occurring]. B. A claim of sexual harassment, discrimination or retaliation may have occurred: (1) in the workplace or at a work-related event coordinated by or through the employer; or (2) between employees or between an employer and an employee, whether occurring on or off the employment premises. [B.] C. This section does not prohibit a settlement agreement between [an employee or former employee] a prospective, current or former employee or an independent contractor and a private employer alleging sexual harassment, discrimination or retaliation from containing confidentiality provisions. A confidentiality provision is only permitted [when] to pertain to: (1) [it relates to] the monetary amount of a settlement; or (2) at the prospective, current or former employee's or independent contractor's request, [it prohibits] the disclosure of facts that could lead to the identification of the employee or independent contractor. [C. At the sole request of the employee, a settlement agreement subject to this section may contain a confidentiality provision that prevents the disclosure of factual information related to the underlying sexual harassment, discrimination or retaliation claim.] D. The provisions of this [subsection] section shall not be construed to prevent disclosure of information that is the subject of the confidentiality provision if disclosure is required to be made in a judicial, administrative or other governmental proceeding pursuant to a valid subpoena or other applicable order as otherwise required by law. [D.] E. Except as provided in Subsections [B and] C and D of this section, a confidentiality provision in a settlement agreement subject to this section is void and unenforceable as a matter of law." - 3 -